District of Columbia statutes.
16-4005

Beginning and concluding collaborative law process.

(a)

A collaborative law process begins when the parties sign a collaborative law participation agreement.

(b)

The tribunal may not order a party to participate in a collaborative law process over that party’s objection.

(c)

A collaborative law process is concluded by:

(1)

The resolution of a collaborative matter as evidenced by a signed record;

(2)

The resolution of a part of the collaborative matter, evidenced by a signed record, in which the parties agree that the remaining parts of the matter will not be resolved in the process; or

(3)

The termination of the process.

(d)

A collaborative law process terminates:

(1)

When a party gives notice to other parties in a record that the process is ended; or

(2)

When a party:

(A)

Begins a proceeding related to a collaborative matter without the agreement of all parties; or

(B)

In a pending proceeding related to the matter:

(i)

Initiates a pleading, motion, order to show cause, or request for a conference with the tribunal;

(ii)

Requests that the proceeding be put on the tribunal’s calendar; or

(iii)

Takes similar action requiring notice to be sent to the parties; or

(3)

Except as otherwise provided by subsection (g) of this section, when a party discharges a collaborative lawyer or a collaborative lawyer withdraws from further representation of a party.

(e)

A party’s collaborative lawyer shall give prompt notice to all parties in a record of a discharge or withdrawal.

(f)

A party may terminate a collaborative law process with or without cause.

(g)

Notwithstanding the discharge or withdrawal of a collaborative lawyer, a collaborative law process continues, if not later than 30 days after the date that the notice of the discharge or withdrawal of a collaborative lawyer required by subsection (e) of this section is sent to the parties:

(1)

The unrepresented party engages a successor collaborative lawyer; and

(2)

In a signed record:

(A)

The parties consent to continue the process by reaffirming the collaborative law participation agreement;

(B)

The agreement is amended to identify the successor collaborative lawyer; and

(C)

The successor collaborative lawyer confirms the lawyer’s representation of a party in the collaborative process.

(h)

A collaborative law process does not conclude if, with the consent of the parties, a party requests the tribunal to approve a resolution of the collaborative matter or any part thereof as evidenced by a signed record.

(i)

A collaborative law participation agreement may provide additional methods of concluding a collaborative law process.

May 9, 2012, D.C. Law 19-125, § 2(b), 59 DCR 1928
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 5 of the Uniform Collaborative Law Act.